Louisiana, session 2026, SB402.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:236(A), (B), and (C)(1), 407.33(1), and 407.35 are hereby
Page 1 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
amended and reenacted and Subpart H of Part I of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:50 through 50.4, and Subpart H-1 of Part I
of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S.
17:50.7 through 50.8, and R.S. 17:236(F) and 236.1.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART H. PRESERVATION OF RELIGIOUS EDUCATION ACT
§50. Short title
This Subpart shall be known as and may be cited as the "Preservation
of Religious Education Act".
§50.1. Legislative findings; purpose
A. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The legislature enacted Act 358 of the 2025 Regular Session of the
Legislature to clarify and codify parental rights to religious education that are
guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States of America and the
Constitution of Louisiana and made effective by the Preservation of Religious
Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq. Act 358 clarifies that state and local
government agencies may not discriminate against religious institutions "by
requiring restrictions that are greater than the least severe restrictions that are
imposed upon or enforced against any secular business, service, or assembly".
(2) With respect to the rights of parents to choose religious schools and
educational opportunities that comport with their religious values, the Supreme
Court of the United States has affirmed all of the following:
(a) "For many people of faith, there are few religious acts more
important than the religious education of their children." (Mahmoud v. Taylor,
606 U.S. 522, 523 (2024))
(b) "And the practice of educating one's children in one's religious
beliefs, like all religious acts and practices, receives a generous measure of
constitutional protection. The Constitution protects, for example, a parent's
decision to send his or her child to a private religious school instead of a public
school." (Mahmoud v. Taylor, 606 U.S. 522, 523 (2024))
Page 2 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
(c) The right of parents to choose the means and methods whereby their
children may be educated free from unreasonable or excessive government
interference is a liberty protected by the Fourteenth Amendment. (Pierce v.
Society of Sisters, 268 U.S. 510 (1925))
(d) "A State need not subsidize private education. But once a State
decides to do so, it cannot disqualify some private schools solely because they
are religious." (Espinoza v. Montana Department of Revenue, et al, 591 U.S. 464
(2020) and Carson v. Makin, 596 U.S. 767 (2022))
(3) The Preservation of Religious Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq., was
originally enacted in the 2010 Regular Session of the Legislature to protect both
the religious rights of the individual as well as churches and religious
institutions from discrimination or disparate treatment by all state and local
government agencies, boards, and commissions. When enacted in 2010, R.S.
13:5232 affirmed that the "(f)ree exercise of religion is a fundamental right of
the highest order in this state".
(4) The court in Rankins v. Louisiana State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education held that the, "La. Const. Art. VIII §4 gives BESE the
limited power to approve a private elementary, secondary, or proprietary
school with a sustained curriculum or specialized course of study of quality at
least equal to that prescribed for similar public schools. . . BESE's authority
over non-public schools is further constrained by the United States Constitution.
The United States Supreme Court has held that the First and Fourteenth
Amendments prevent the state from intruding into family decisions in the areas
of religious freedom and parental control over the rearing of children. . . Under
these constitutional proscriptions, BESE cannot dictate the curriculum. . . in
non-public schools without infringing upon the rights of parents who choose to
send their children to non-public schools or who choose religious over public
education". (Rankins v. Louisiana State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education, 637 So.2d 548, 552-553)
Page 3 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
B. The purpose of this Subpart is to clarify that the protections provided
for religious persons, entities, and religious institutions, pursuant to the
Preservation of Religious Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq., are enforceable
against all government agencies, including government educational agencies
that are authorized or governed by this Title.
§50.2. Definitions
Unless otherwise indicated, the definitions provided for in R.S. 13:5234
and the following definitions shall apply to this Subpart:
(1) "Burdening" shall have the same meaning as "burden" as provided
for in R.S. 13:5234.
(2) "Church-affiliated school" or "religious educational institution"
means an educational institution operated with a religious mission or purpose
by a church, an association of churches, a religious order, body, or institution
which qualifies for exemption from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or (d) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. Section 501,
and includes any one or more of the following:
(a) Is established for the purpose of affirming the ministry of the church,
association of churches, religious order, body or religious institutions and assists
religious parents in their duty to educate their minor children to be self-
sufficient and successful members of society upon reaching adulthood.
(b) Is a religious nonpublic prekindergarten school program established
pursuant to R.S. 17:50.7.
(c) Is a religious nonpublic elementary or secondary educational
institution, which is approved, or seeking approval, from the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education, as provided for in R.S. 17:11.
(d) Is a religious nonpublic elementary or secondary education
institution not seeking state approval, as provided for in R.S. 17:221.
(e) Is a religious educational program that is implemented or conducted
by two or more parents whose children are participating in a religious
Page 4 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
educational program, without regard to hours or days of the week and
regardless of age, pursuant to R.S. 13:5233.1.
(f) Is a nonpublic institution of higher education that offers or provides
religious training or theological education and may also offer training in a
secular field of endeavor.
(3) "Governmental educational agency" shall have the same meaning as
"governmental agency", as defined in R.S. 13:5234, and includes but is not
limited to the state Department of Education, the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, postsecondary education management boards, any
city, parish, or other local public school board and any other state agency that
has authority over educational institutions and educational opportunities
pursuant to this Title or any other provision of law.
(4) "Parent" or "parents" means a biological birth parent, an adoptive
parent, or the legal guardian who is authorized by law to make decisions
regarding the education of their child.
(5) "Adult student" or "adult" means a person who is eighteen years of
age or older or is an emancipated minor who is authorized by law to make his
own decisions regarding his education.
§50.3. Protection of religious education; parental rights to religious education
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or regulation to the
contrary, no governmental educational agency shall discriminate against any
church-affiliated school, religious educational institution, any adult student, or
any parent who chooses a church-affiliated school or religious educational
institution to educate their minor child by burdening the church-affiliated
school, religious educational institution, adult student, or parent's free exercise
of religion in violation of Article I, Section 8 of the Constitution of Louisiana,
the First Amendment of the Constitution of the United States of America, the
Preservation of Religious Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq., or the provisions
of this Subpart.
Page 5 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
B. No governmental educational agency shall discriminate against a
church-affiliated school or religious educational institution by burdening the
church-affiliated school or religious institution with licensing requirements or
other restrictions, or a combination thereof, that are greater than the least
severe restrictions that are imposed upon or enforced against any public school
or any secular nonpublic school, in violation of R.S. 13:5233.
C. If the government enacts an educational benefit or makes an
appropriation to provide scholarships, educational opportunities, or subsidies
in the form of tax deductions, tax credits, or other monetary benefits to allow
students to attend a nonpublic school or a nonpublic educational program, then
the scholarship, subsidy, or benefit shall not be denied or reduced solely because
the provider is affiliated with a church or other religious organization.
D. In furtherance of the legislative purposes and legislative intent set
forth in the Preservation of Religious Education Act, R.S. 17:50.1, the
provisions of this Subpart are enacted to implement safeguards to avoid
violating the constitutionally protected rights to the free exercise of religion
guaranteed to parents, adult students, church-affiliated schools, and other
religious educational institutions.
§50.4. Construction of Subpart; remedies
A. Any claim for relief for violations of this Subpart shall be made
pursuant to the Preservation of Religious Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq.
B. Nothing in this Subpart is intended to limit, supercede, or nullify any
other protections with respect to religious liberty that are granted pursuant to
other applicable federal law, state law, the Constitution of Louisiana, and the
Constitution of the United States of America.
SUBPART H-1. EDUCATIONAL CHOICE IN
OPPORTUNITIES FOR RELIGIOUS PARENTS
§50.7. Religious prekindergarten programs; rights of parents
A. A nonpublic elementary school that is operated by a church affiliated
Page 6 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
school or religious educational institution, as defined in R.S. 17:50.2, may
develop and offer a religious prekindergarten program of instruction in
furtherance of the mission and purpose of the church-affiliated or religious
institution so that parents may exercise their constitutionally protected rights
to choose religious education for their children.
B. A religious nonpublic prekindergarten program that is established
pursuant to this Section shall be part of a nonpublic elementary school, as
defined in R.S. 17:236. Therefore, a religious nonpublic elementary school
prekindergarten program shall not be considered an early learning center, as
defined in R.S. 17:407.33.
C. A religious nonpublic prekindergarten program that is part of an
approved elementary school shall meet all requirements for an approved
nonpublic prekindergarten program, as provided in R.S. 17:236.1.1.
§50.8. Applicability
A. The definitions that are provided for in R.S. 13:5234 and R.S. 17:50.2
shall apply to this Subpart.
B. The provisions of this Subpart are subject to all provisions and
remedies provided in the Preservation of Religious Education Act, R.S. 17:50
et seq.
* * *
§236. Definition of a school
A. For the purposes of this Chapter, a school is defined as an institution for
the teaching of children, consisting of an adequate physical plant, whether owned or
leased, instructional staff members, and students. For such an institution to be
classified as a school, within the meaning of this Chapter, instructional staff
members shall meet the following requirements:
(1) if If a public day school or a nonpublic school which receives local, state,
or federal funds or support, directly or indirectly, they shall be certified or approved
in accordance with rules established by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Page 7 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
Education;.
(2) if If a nonpublic school not seeking state approval which receives no
local, state, or federal educational funds or support, directly or indirectly, they it
shall meet such requirements as may be prescribed by the school or the church and
is subject to the zoning requirements and other provisions of R.S. 13:5233.1 that
apply to churches.
B.(1) In addition, except as otherwise provided in Subsection B of this
Section, any such institution, to be classified as a school, shall operate a minimum
session of not less than one hundred eighty days.
(2) Solely for purposes of compulsory attendance in a nonpublic school, a
child who participates in a home study program approved by the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall be considered in attendance at a day
school; a home study program shall be approved if it offers a sustained curriculum
of a quality at least equal to that offered by public schools at the same grade level.
(3) Solely for purposes of compulsory attendance, a child shall be considered
in attendance at a day school if the child is participating in the LA GATOR
Scholarship Program pursuant to R.S. 17:4037.1 et seq.
B. Effective for the 2005-2006 school year, the provisions of Subsection A
of this Section relative to the required operation of a minimum school session of not
less than one hundred eighty days shall not be applicable. However, the State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education may adopt rules effective for the 2005-2006
school year relative to the minimum session required of any institution in order to
be classified as a school.
C. For the purpose of reporting data:
(1) The term "elementary school" means a school composed of any span of
grades prekindergarten through grade eight that and excludes grades nine through
twelve.
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a
Page 8 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
prekindergarten program is an elementary school, as defined in Paragraph
(C)(1) of this Section and, therefore, shall not be considered a daycare or an
early learning center and is, therefore exempt from licensing requirements
pursuant to R.S. 17:407.31 et seq., and R.S. 17:407.41.
§236.1.1. Requirements for an approved nonpublic prekindergarten program;
criminal history reports; child safety and welfare minimum
standards
A. If a nonpublic school that is approved, pursuant to Article VIII,
Section 4 of the Constitution of Louisiana, is seeking further approval to add a
prekindergarten program for three-year-old students or four-year-old students
to its existing approved nonpublic elementary school or to meet the
requirements to receive funds or support, pursuant to R.S. 17:236(A)(1), then
the approved nonpublic school shall submit to the state Department of
Education all of the following:
(1) Evidence that the educational institutional applicant meets the
definition of a school, pursuant to R.S. 17:236(A)(1).
(2) The sustained curriculum for the limited purposes of Article VIII,
Section 4 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. Any parent who chooses to enroll their child in a religious or other
nonpublic prekindergarten program authorized pursuant to this Section shall
sign an acknowledgment that the parent is aware that they are enrolling their
child into a religious or other prekindergarten school program that is operated
by an approved nonpublic elementary school and, therefore, the facility is not
a daycare that is subject to federal daycare regulations, as codified in 45 CFR
Part 98, or its successor citation, and is not licensed by the state as an early
learning center, pursuant to R.S. 17:407.31 et seq.
C. If the religious approved nonpublic elementary school or other
nonpublic elementary school chooses to operate a prekindergarten program
pursuant to this Section on or after January 1, 2026, the governing authority of
Page 9 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
the church-affiliated school, religious educational institution, or the approved
nonpublic school shall develop and adopt an enhanced safety plan to provide
enhanced safety protocols due to the age of the prekindergarten students.
D. All teachers and other employees of the prekindergarten program
must have a criminal background check or a criminal history review, as
required in R.S. 17:15.
E. If prior to January 1, 2026, a church-affiliated school, religious
educational institution, or other nonpublic school that was previously approved
and in good standing with the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education to operate a nonpublic prekindergarten program, then the
department's prior approval shall remain in effect thereafter in accordance
with the provisions of this Section.
F. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a church-affiliated school,
religious educational institution, or a nonpublic school from electing to apply
for a license to operate an early learning center, pursuant to R.S. 17:407.31 et
seq., instead of, or in addition to, an elementary school prekindergarten
program authorized pursuant to this Section.
G. Except for those programs and schools that are subject to church
zoning, building code, fire safety programs, and other legal requirements,
pursuant to R.S. 13:5233.1, all approved prekindergarten programs that are
authorized pursuant to this Section shall meet all child safety and welfare
minimum standards for approved nonpublic schools, including fire safety
standards, pursuant to R.S. 40:1578.6, all health and safety standards, pursuant
to R.S. 40:5, and all local government safety requirements that are applicable
to approved nonpublic schools to ensure the safety of children.
* * *
§407.33. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
Page 10 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
(1) "Camp" means any place or facility operated by any institution, society,
agency, corporation, person or persons, or any other group which includes any of
the following:
(a) serves Serves only children five three years of age or older and operates
only when school is not in session during the summer months or school holidays
including but not limited to.
(b) a Provides Vacation Bible School, or Bible Camp, Torah camp, or
religious camp that is operated by a church or religious organization for
children, regardless of age, that is exempt from licensure pursuant to R.S.
17:407.35.
(c) Operates an after-school or weekend extracurricular or athletic
program, including but not limited to a private debate club, dance class,
cheerleading class, sports training, and any competition related thereto.
(d) Operates an after-school or weekend tutoring program or other
educational or enrichment program authorized by this Title.
* * *
§407.35. Exemptions from licensure requirements
A. The provisions of this Part shall not apply to grades kindergarten and
above, prekindergarten programs attached to a public and nonpublic day school,
Louisiana Montessori accredited or provisionally accredited approved schools, a
school as defined in R.S. 17:236, camps, registered family child day care homes,
and care given without charge. However, all prekindergarten programs shall comply
with the child safety and welfare minimum standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41
or R.S. 17:236.1.1, whichever is applicable.
B.(1) A The provisions of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection shall apply to
a recognized church or other religious organization which is qualified as a
tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, which
does any of the following:
(a) remains Remains open for not more than twenty-four hours in a
Page 11 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
continuous seven-day week, and in which no individual child remains for more than
twenty-four hours in one continuous stay,.
(b) Operates a Vacation Bible School, Bible camp, Torah camp, or other
religious camp.
(c) Operates a mother's day out program, pursuant to R.S. 13:5233.1.
(2) A religious organization conducting religious activities pursuant to
this Subsection or pursuant to R.S. 13:5233.1 shall not be considered an early
learning center for the purposes of this Part.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:24.8(B)(2) is hereby repealed.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute, pursuant to its statutory authority, is
hereby directed to change "prekindergarten program" to "public prekindergarten program"
and to change "prekindergarten programs" to "public prekindergarten programs" in R.S.
17:407.41.
Section 4. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education is hereby
authorized and encouraged to adopt emergency rules, pursuant to R.S. 49:962, to implement
the provisions of this Act in a manner so as to avoid school closures that may otherwise
result in the 2026-2027 school year and in a manner so as to avoid the loss of available
summer camps and other options for parents during the summer.
Section 5. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education is hereby
authorized and encouraged to review its existing administrative rules in light of the
legislative findings in Section 1 of this Act to determine if any rules have the potential to
violate the constitutional rights of religious and other nonpublic schools.
Section 6. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end
the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 7. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 12 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-658 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 402
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.